apertium-krl.krl.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_EMÄN/TÄ

0:tä  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:nä  NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:t   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON NOUN_LAI/TA

0:ta  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ja  NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:ta  NOUN_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK ;
0:ta  NOUN_SGILL_H ;
0:to  NOUN_PLPAR_I ;
0:jo  NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_KER/TA

0:ta  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ra  NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:ta  NOUN_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK ;
0:ta  NOUN_SGILL_H ;
0:tu  NOUN_SGPAR_A ;
0:to  NOUN_PLPAR_I ;
0:ro  NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_VAL/TA

0:ta  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:la  NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:ta  NOUN_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK ;
0:ta  NOUN_SGILL_H ;
0:tu  NOUN_SGPAR_A ;
0:to  NOUN_PLPAR_I ;
0:lo  NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_ŠIÄN/TÖ

0:tö  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:nö  NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:nö  NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON NOUN_ŠY/Y

0:y NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:y NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:y NOUN_SGPAR_TÄ ;

LEXICON NOUN_MU/A

0:a NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:a NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:a NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;

LEXICON NOUN_P/IÄ

0:iä NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:iä NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:iä NOUN_SGPAR_TÄ ;
0:ä NOUN_PLPAR_ITÄ ;
0:ä NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON NOUN_VUAT/E

0:e   NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:tehe NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:teh   NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:teh   NOUN_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON NOUN_LAIT/EH

0:eh   NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:tehe NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:teh   NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:teh   NOUN_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON NOUN_PERIN/NEH

0:neh   NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:tehe NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:teh   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0:teh   NOUN_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON NOUN_ALOVEH

0   NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0   NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;
0   NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:i   NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;


LEXICON NOUN_PEREH

0   NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0   NOUN_SGPAR_TÄ ;
0   NOUN_PLPAR_IE ;
0   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON NOUN_AI/KA

0:ka  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ja  NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:ka  NOUN_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK ;
0:ka  NOUN_SGILL_H ;
0:ko  NOUN_SGPAR_A ;
0:ku  NOUN_SGPAR_A ;
0:ko  NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_AIH/E

0:e  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ee  NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:ie  NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:et  NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;

LEXICON NOUN_VAIH/E

0:e  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ie  NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:et  NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;

LEXICON NOUN_MUR/RE

0:re  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:tehe  NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:teh  NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_UU/SIVUOSI

%<sg%>%<nom%>:sivuosi  # ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:vvenvuuvven  # ;

LEXICON NOUN_VU/OSI

0:osi  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ot   NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;
0:os   NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:uvve NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_K/ÄSI

0:äsi  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ät   NOUN_SGPAR_TÄ ;
0:äis  NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0:iä   NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON NOUN_PO/IKA

0:ika  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ja  NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:j  NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_RO/VEH

0:veh  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:pehe  NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:peh  NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:veh  NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;
0:peh  NOUN_PLPAR_IE ;


LEXICON NUM_Y/KSI

0:ksi NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0:hte NUM_CASES_SG_STRONG_FRONT ;
0:he NUM_CASES_SG_WEAK_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_KA/KŠI

0:kši NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0:hte NUM_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK ;
0:he NUM_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_KOLM/E

0:e NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e NUM_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_NEL/LÄ

0:l’ä  NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0:l’ä  NUM_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_VII/SI

0:zi  NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0:jje NUM_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_KUU/ŠI

0:zi  NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0:vve NUM_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_SEIČČE/MEN

0:men NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0:me  NUM_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_KAHEKŠA/N

0:n  NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0    NUM_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_YHEKŠÄ/N

0:n  NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0    NUM_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_KYMMENE/N

0:n  NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0   NUM_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_Š/ATA

0:ata NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ua NUM_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_MILJON/A

0:a NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0:u NUM_SGPAR_A ;
0:a NUM_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0   NUM_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON NUM_MILJARD/I

0:i NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0:i NUM_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0   NUM_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON NUM_ENŠIMMÄI/NI

%<pos%>:ni  NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:se  NUM_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
%<pos%>:s  NUM_CASES_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_TOI/NI

%<pos%>:ni NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:se NUM_CASES_SG_BACK ;
%<pos%>:s NUM_PLPAR_IE ;
%<pos%>:s NUM_SGPAR_TA ;
%<pos%>:s NUM_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_KOLMA/Š

%<pos%>:š  NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:nne NUM_CASES_SG_BACK ;
%<pos%>:ns NUM_PLPAR_IE ;
%<pos%>:t  NUM_SGPAR_TA ;
%<pos%>:ns NUM_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_NELLÄ/Š

%<pos%>:š  NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
%<pos%>:nne NUM_CASES_SG_WEAK_FRONT ;
%<pos%>:nte NUM_CASES_SG_STRONG_FRONT ;
%<pos%>:n NUM_SGPAR_TÄ ;

LEXICON NUM_PARI

0  NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0  NUM_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK ;
0  NUM_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;


LEXICON PUNCT_PISTE

0   # ;

LEXICON SYM_.

0 # ;

!! Morphs

LEXICON ACRO_SGNOM_0

%<sg%>%<nom%>:0 # ;

LEXICON ACRO_CASES

%<sg%>%<gen%>:n # ;

LEXICON AUX_PCP

!! FIXME
%<pp%>:t # ;
%<pp%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:n # ;

LEXICON AUX_3SG_PI

%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:pi # ;

LEXICON AUX_3SG_0

%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:0 # ;

LEXICON AUX_3SG_Y

%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:y # ;


LEXICON AUX_CONNEG_0

%<actv%>%<pri%>%<conneg%>:0 # ;

LEXICON AUX_PRES_FRONT

%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:n # ;
%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:t # ;
%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:mmä # ;
%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:ttä # ;

LEXICON AUX_PRES_BACK

%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:n # ;
%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:t # ;
%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<qst%>:tko # ;
%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:mma # ;
%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:tta # ;

!!!LEXICON AUX_PAST_WEAK_FRONT
!!!
!!!%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:in # ;
!!!%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:it # ;
!!!%<npgi%>%<cev%>%<c1%>%<cy%>:vzzä # ;
!!!%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:ittä # ;

LEXICON AUX_PAST_WEAK_BACK

%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:in # ;
%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:it # ;
%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:imma # ;
%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:itta # ;

LEXICON AUX_PAST_3SG_0

%<actv%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:0 # ;

LEXICON AUX_PASSIVE_H

%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:h # ;
%<pasv%>%<pri%>:h # ;

LEXICON AUX_PAST_PASSIVE_H

%<actv%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:h # ;
%<pasv%>%<past%>:h # ;

LEXICON AUX_COND

%<actv%>%<cni%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:isin # ;
%<actv%>%<cni%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:isit # ;
%<actv%>%<cni%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:is # ;
%<actv%>%<cni%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<qst%>:isko # ;

LEXICON AUX_INF_A

%<inf%>:a  # ;

LEXICON AUX_INF_Ä

%<inf%>:ä  # ;

LEXICON AUX_INF_E

%<inf%>%<ine%>:ešša  # ;
%<inf%>%<ine%>%<px3sp%>:eššah  # ;

LEXICON AUX_INF_MA

%<inf%>%<ill%>:mah # ;
%<inf%>%<ine%>:mašša # ;
%<inf%>%<abe%>:matta # ;

LEXICON AUX_INF_MÄ

%<inf%>%<ill%>:mäh # ;
%<inf%>%<ine%>:maššä # ;
%<inf%>%<abe%>:mättä # ;

!LEXICON AUX_IMPV
!
!%<actv%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:0 # ;
!%<actv%>%<pri%>%<conneg%>:0 # ;

LEXICON AUX_PCP_TY

%<pasv%>%<pp%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ty # ;
%<pasv%>%<pp%>%<sg%>%<par%>%<px3sp%>:työh # ;

LEXICON AUX_PCP_N

%<actv%>%<pp%>:n # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>%<sg%>%<conneg%>:n # ;

LEXICON VERB_CONNEG_0

%<actv%>%<pri%>%<conneg%>:0 # ;


LEXICON VERB_PAST_3SG_0

%<actv%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:0 # ;

LEXICON VERB_3SG_U

%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:u # ;
%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<qst%>:uko # ;

LEXICON VERB_3SG_Y

%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:y # ;

LEXICON VERB_PASSIVE_H

%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:h # ;
%<pasv%>%<pri%>:h # ;
%<pasv%>%<pri%>%<conneg%>:0 # ;

LEXICON VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H

%<actv%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:h CLITS_KI_OPT ;
%<pasv%>%<past%>:h CLITS_KI_OPT ;

LEXICON VERB_IMPVPL_BACK

%<actv%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:kkua # ;

LEXICON VERB_IMPV

%<actv%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pri%>%<conneg%>:0 # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_MÄ

%<inf%>%<ill%>:mäh # ;
%<inf%>%<ine%>:mäššä # ;
%<inf%>%<ade%>:mällä # ;
%<inf%>%<abe%>:mättä # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_MA

%<inf%>%<ill%>:mah # ;
%<inf%>%<ine%>:mašša # ;
%<inf%>%<abe%>:matta # ;
%<inf%>%<ade%>:malla # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_TA

%<inf%>:ta # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_TÄ

%<inf%>:tä # ;

!! FIXME: not sure
LEXICON VERB_INF_AS

%<ger%>%<ine%>:as’s’a # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_A

%<inf%>:a # ;
%<inf%>%<tra%>%<px3sp%>:akseh # ;

!! FIXME: ger or sup or some other
LEXICON VERB_INF_EN

%<ger%>:en # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_Ä

%<inf%>:ä # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_Ö

%<inf%>:ö # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_O

%<inf%>:o # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_E

%<inf%>:e # ;

LEXICON NOUN
aihe%<n%>:aihe  NOUN_AIH/E ;
aika%<n%>:ai  NOUN_AI/KA ;
aloveh%<n%>:aloveh NOUN_ALOVEH ;
emäntä%<n%>:emän NOUN_EMÄN/TÄ ;
flashmob%<n%>:flashmob NOUN_ALOVEH ;
hiiren#poika%<n%>:hiiren0po NOUN_PO/IKA ;
huoneh%<n%>:huoneh NOUN_ALOVEH ;
huumeh%<n%>:huumeh NOUN_ALOVEH ;
isäntä%<n%>:isän NOUN_EMÄN/TÄ ;
kehityš#loveh%<n%>:kehityš0aloveh NOUN_ALOVEH ;
kerta%<n%>:ker  NOUN_KER/TA ;
kiukoa%<n%>:kiuko NOUN_MU/A ;
kiukua%<n%>:kiuku NOUN_MU/A ;
käsi%<n%>:k  NOUN_K/ÄSI ;
laita%<n%>:lai NOUN_LAI/TA ;
laiteh%<n%>:lait NOUN_LAIT/EH ;
laulu#mua%<n%>:laulu0mu NOUN_MU/A ;
laušeh%<n%>:laušeh NOUN_ALOVEH ;
mua%<n%>:mu NOUN_MU/A ;
murre%<n%>:mur  NOUN_MUR/RE ;
niemi#mua%<n%>:niemi0mu NOUN_MU/A ;
olka#piä%<n%>:olka0p NOUN_P/IÄ ;
olka-piä%<n%>:olka-p NOUN_P/IÄ ;
pereh%<n%>:pereh NOUN_PEREH ;
perinneh%<n%>:perin NOUN_PERIN/NEH ;
pisteh%<n%>:pisteh NOUN_PEREH ;
piä#aihe%<n%>:piä0aih  NOUN_AIH/E ;
piä%<n%>:p NOUN_P/IÄ ;
poika%<n%>:po NOUN_PO/IKA ;
roveh%<n%>:ro NOUN_RO/VEH ;
šilta%<n%>:šil NOUN_VAL/TA ;
šiäntö%<n%>:šiän NOUN_ŠIÄN/TÖ ;
šuhteh%<n%>:šuhteh NOUN_ALOVEH ;
šyy%<n%>:šy NOUN_ŠY/Y ;
šähkö#laiteh%<n%>:šähkö0lait NOUN_LAIT/EH ;
taiteh%<n%>:taiteh NOUN_ALOVEH ;
taša#valta%<n%>:taša0val NOUN_VAL/TA ;
ulko#vaihe%<n%>:ulko0vaih  NOUN_VAIH/E ;
uusi#vuosi%<n%>:uu  NOUN_UU/SIVUOSI ;
vaihe%<n%>:vaih  NOUN_VAIH/E ;
valta%<n%>:val NOUN_VAL/TA ;
vehkeh%<n%>:vehkeh NOUN_PEREH ;
vuate%<n%>:vuat NOUN_VUAT/E ;
vuosi%<n%>:vu  NOUN_VU/OSI ;
yhyšvalta%<n%>:yhyšval NOUN_VAL/TA ;
